docs/apertium-krl.krl.lexc.md
| *word* |
|:-------|
| ¤ (sym) |
| ¢ (sym) |
| $ (sym) |
| $ (sym) |
| £ (sym) |
| ¥ (sym) |
| ¥ (sym) |
| ₤ (sym) |
| € (sym) |
| € (sym) |
|  0 |
|  0. (adj) (ord ) (sg ) (nom ) |
|  0 (num) (card ) (sg ) (nom ) |
| ½ (sym) (n ) |
| ¼ (sym) (n ) |
| 1. (adj) (ord ) (sg ) (nom ) |
| 1 (num) (card ) (sg ) (nom ) |
| ¹ (sym) (n ) |
| 2. (adj) (ord ) (sg ) (nom ) |
| 2 (num) (card ) (sg ) (nom ) |
| ² (sym) (n ) |
| 3. (adj) (ord ) (sg ) (nom ) |
| 3 (num) (card ) (sg ) (nom ) |
|  (3 (sym) |
| ³ (sym) (n ) |
| 4. (adj) (ord ) (sg ) (nom ) |
| 4 (num) (card ) (sg ) (nom ) |
| 5. (adj) (ord ) (sg ) (nom ) |
| 5 (num) (card ) (sg ) (nom ) |
| 6. (adj) (ord ) (sg ) (nom ) |
| 6 (num) (card ) (sg ) (nom ) |
| 7. (adj) (ord ) (sg ) (nom ) |
| 7 (num) (card ) (sg ) (nom ) |
| 8. (adj) (ord ) (sg ) (nom ) |
| 8 (num) (card ) (sg ) (nom ) |
| 9. (adj) (ord ) (sg ) (nom ) |
| 9 (num) (card ) (sg ) (nom ) |
| a (cnjcoo) |
| AEK (np) (al ) (acr ) |
| afrikkalaine (n) |
| ahkerašti (adv) |
| aihe (n) |
| aikakauš#lehti (n) |
| aika (n) |
| aikana (post) |
| aikasemmin (adv) |
| aikuhini (n) |
| aina (adv) |
| ainehisto (n) |
| Aino (np) (ant ) (f ) |
| aito (adj) |
| aivan (adv) |
| ajatella (vblex) |
| ajatuš (n) |
| ajelomini (n) |
| Akropolis (np) (top ) |
| aktijo (n) |
| ala (n) |
| Aleksandr (np) (ant ) (m ) |
| Aleksandrovna (np) (cog ) |
| Aleksejeva (np) (cog ) |
| aličči (post) |
| alkoa (vblex) |
| alkoholi (n) |
| alkuan (adv) |
| alku (n) |
| alkuperäini (adj) |
| alla (post) |
| alottoa (vblex) |
| alovehellini (adj) |
| aloveh (n) |
| alta (post) |
| alta (post) |
| ammatti#mieš (n) |
| Anna (np) (ant ) (f ) |
| anomuš (n) |
| antoa (vblex) |
| antua (vblex) |
| Anuš (np) (top ) |
| applikatijo (n) |
| apu (n) |
| Arbat (np) (top ) |
| Arhankeli (np) (top ) |
| arhitektuuri (n) |
| arki#elämä (n) |
| armenijalaini (adj) |
| artišta (n) |
| artista (n) |
| Art-šat’or (np) (al ) |
| artteli (n) |
| Art-teltta (np) (al ) |
| Artur (np) (ant ) (m ) |
| ašettoa (vblex) |
| aštie (n) |
| aštuo (vblex) |
| Ateena (np) (top ) |
| ativoija (vblex) |
| ativo (n) |
| atressi (n) |
| Aunuš (np) (top ) |
| Australija (np) (top ) |
| auto (n) |
| auttoa (vblex) |
| auttua (vblex) |
| avata (vblex) |
| avomielini (adj) |
| avomielisešti (adv) |
| avuamini (n) |
| azerbaidžanilaini (adj) |
| biologini (n) |
| Bol’šoi (np) (top ) |
| Building (np) (al ) |
| čikana (n) |
| Colosseus (np) (top ) |
| Cookin#šuari (np) (top ) |
| da (cnjcoo) |
| Danil (np) (ant ) (m ) |
| diplomi (n) |
|   |
|   |
| eččie (vblex) |
| eepossa (n) |
| eeppini (adj) |
| ehokaš (n) |
| ehottoa (vblex) |
| ehotuš (n) |
| Eiffel (np) (top ) |
| ei (vaux) (neg ) |
| elavuttamine (n) |
| elektronikka (n) |
| eleä (vblex) |
| Elias (np) (ant ) (m ) |
| eli (cnjcoo) |
| Eli (np) (top ) |
| elvyttämini (n) |
| eläjä (n) |
| eläkehfondi (n) |
| eläkeläine (n) |
| eläkeläis#liitto (n) |
| eläkkeläis#liitto (n) |
| elämä (n) |
| elävyttämini (n) |
| Empire (np) (top ) |
| emäntä (n) |
| enemmäh (adv) |
| enemmän (adv) |
| enetsi#kieline (adj) |
| ennen (post) |
| enši (adv) |
| enšimmäini (adj) (ord ) |
| enšimäini (adj) (ord ) |
| enšin (adv) |
| enämmän (adv) |
| enämpi (adv) |
| epä#virallini (adj) |
| Eremitaaši (np) (top ) |
| eri (adj) |
| eri (adv) |
| eri-ikäne (adj) |
| erikoine (adj) |
| erilaini (adj) |
| erimoini (adj) |
| erittäin (adv) |
| erottoa (vblex) |
| eryäs (adj) |
| eräs (adj) |
| esiintyjä (n) |
| esiintymä (n) |
| esimerkiksi (adv) |
| esitteä (vblex) |
| esittyä (vblex) |
| esityš (n) |
| esityš#numero (n) |
| etno#illačču (n) |
| etno#illačču (n) |
| etnokulttuuri#keškuš (n) |
| etno#tjuttora (n) |
| etno#tjuttora (n) |
| etno#tjuttora (n) |
| etno#tjuttora (n) |
| etu (n) |
| etuštaja (n) |
| eväš (n) |
| federalini (adj) |
| Fedosova (np) (cog ) |
| festivali (n) |
| Fevronija (np) (cog ) |
| flashmob (n) |
| folkloristi (n) |
| folklori#teatteri (n) |
| fondi (n) |
| forumi (n) |
| Galina (np) (ant ) (f ) |
| generattori (n) |
| Glazkov (np) (cog ) |
| Group (np) (al ) |
| guslin#šoittaja (n) |
| hahmo (n) |
| halličuš (n) |
| hallinto (n) |
| hallituš (n) |
| haltija (n) |
| halu (n) |
| halu (n) |
| hantin#kieline (adj) |
| harraštaja (n) |
| harvoin (adv) |
| heitteä (vblex) |
| Helena (np) (ant ) (f ) |
| helppo (adj) |
| henkellini (adj) |
| henkilö#kilpailu (n) |
| henkilö (n) |
| henki (n) |
| henki (n) |
| herätteä (vblex) |
| herättyä (vblex) |
| heti (adv) |
| Hiekkaveššoš (np) (top ) |
| hieno (adj) |
| hiihto (n) |
| hiihtourheilu (n) |
| hiiren#poika (n) |
| Hiisi (np) (ant ) (m ) |
| hiitourheiluliitto (n) |
| hil’l’ah (adv) |
| hillo (n) |
| himota (vblex) |
| himottoa (vblex) |
| hiä#laulu (n) |
| hiän (prn) (pers ) (p3 ) (sg ) |
| hokšata (vblex) |
| Hotejeva (np) (cog ) |
| Hristo (np) (al ) |
| huaveilla (vblex) |
| hukkuo (vblex) |
| huoleššuttua (vblex) |
| huomata (vblex) |
| huomena (adv) |
| huomeneš (n) |
| huomijo (n) |
| huomijo (n) |
| huoneh (n) |
| huumeh (n) |
| hyreytyä (vblex) |
| hyrähteä (vblex) |
| hyvin (adv) |
| hyvä (adj) |
| hyvä (adj) |
| hyö (prn) (pers ) (p3 ) (pl ) |
| hävijä (n) |
| I (adj) (ord ) (sg ) (nom ) |
| iče#hallinto (n) |
| iče (prn) (refl ) |
| i (cnjcoo) |
| ieššä (adv) |
| ieššä (post) |
| ieššä (post) |
| ieštä (post) |
| ieštävä (adj) |
| ihmeh#muajilma (n) |
| ihmini (n) |
| ihmis#joukko (n) |
| II (adj) (ord ) (sg ) (nom ) |
| III (adj) (ord ) (sg ) (nom ) |
| iisahuš (n) |
| ijäkäš (adj) |
| ikäh (adv) |
| ikäne (adj) |
| ikävöijä (vblex) |
| ili (cnjcoo) |
| ilma (n) |
| ilman (post) |
| ilma#piiri (n) |
| Ilmarini (np) (ant ) (m ) |
| ilmašto (n) |
| Ilmatar (np) (ant ) (f ) |
| ilmeštyö (vblex) |
| ilmi (adv) |
| ilmottoa (vblex) |
| ilta (n) |
| iltasin (adv) |
| innoššuttua (vblex) |
| internetti#šivu (n) |
| invalidi (n) |
| investoija (vblex) |
| investointi (n) |
| investori (n) |
| Irina (np) (ant ) (f ) |
| Iro (np) (ant ) (f ) |
| istorie (n) |
| istorija (n) |
| istuo (vblex) |
| isäntä (n) |
| itkie (vblex) |
| IV (adj) (ord ) (sg ) (nom ) |
| IX (adj) (ord ) (sg ) (nom ) |
| iäni (n) |
| jakšo (n) |
| Jakutija (np) (top ) |
| Jakutija (np) (top ) |
| jalka (n) |
| Jegor (np) (ant ) (m ) |
| Jekaterina (np) (ant ) (f ) |
| Jelagina (np) (cog ) |
| jiähä (vblex) |
| jo (adv) |
| johtaja (n) |
| johto (n) |
| jokahini (prn) (ind ) |
| joka (prn) (ind ) |
| jokavuotini (adj) |
| još (cnjsub) |
| jošpa (cnjsub) |
| jotta (cnjsub) |
| Joukahaine (np) (ant ) (m ) |
| joukko (n) |
| joutuo (vblex) |
| Julija (np) (ant ) (f ) |
| juoni (n) |
| Juri (np) (ant ) (m ) |
| juštih (adv) |
| juuri (adv) |
| juuri (n) |
| Jyškyjärvi (np) (top ) |
| jälelläh (adv) |
| jälkeh (post) |
| järješteä (vblex) |
| järještyä (vblex) |
| järještäjä (n) |
| järještö (n) |
| jäšen (n) |
| jätteä (vblex) |
| kačahtoa (vblex) |
| kaččoa (vblex) |
| kaččoja (n) |
| kaččuo (vblex) |
| ka (cnjcoo) |
| kahekšan (num) (card ) |
| kahekšaš (adj) (ord ) |
| kaiken#moine (adj) |
| kaikičči (adv) |
| kaikki (prn) (ind ) |
| kaimata (vblex) |
| kaimata (vblex) |
| kaitani (adj) |
| kaivoš#työ (n) |
| kakšin (adv) |
| kakši (num) (card ) |
| kala (n) |
| kalaonni (n) |
| kalaštaja (n) |
| Kalevala#eepossa (n) |
| kalevalalaini (adj) |
| Kalevala (np) (al ) |
| Kalevalatalo (np) (al ) |
| Kaliningrad (np) (top ) |
| kallis (adj) |
| kannalta (post) |
| kannattoa (vblex) |
| kannattua (vblex) |
| kannatuš (n) |
| kannettava (adj) |
| kansainvälini (adj) |
| kanšalais#järještö (n) |
| kanšallini (adj) |
| kanšallis#aiheini (adj) |
| kanšallisuš (n) |
| kansan#eepossa (n) |
| kanša (n) |
| kanšan#kulttuuri (n) |
| kanši (n) |
| kanta#rahvaš (n) |
| kantoa (vblex) |
| kantua (vblex) |
| Karel’ski  okatiš (np) (al ) |
| Karhumäki (np) (top ) |
| karjalaine (n) |
| karjalaini (adj) |
| karjala (n) |
| Karjala (np) (top ) |
| kartta (n) |
| kašvatti (n) |
| kašvoa (vblex) |
| katkelma (n) |
| katu (n) |
| kaunis (adj) |
| kauppaholdingi (n) |
| kauppa (n) |
| kaupunkilaini (adj) |
| kaupunki (n) |
| kehitteä (vblex) |
| kehittyä (vblex) |
| kehittämini (n) |
| kehittämini (n) |
| kehityšala (n) |
| kehityš#loveh (n) |
| kehityš (n) |
| kehitämini (n) |
| keino (n) |
| keinotekoini (adj) |
| keinotekoni (adj) |
| kekšie (vblex) |
| keltani (adj) |
| kennie (vblex) |
| kennih (prn) (ind ) |
| ken (prn) (itg ) |
| kenttä (n) |
| keppi (n) |
| kerallah (post) |
| kera (post) |
| kerho (n) |
| keritä (vblex) |
| kerralla (adv) |
| kerran (adv) |
| kerta (n) |
| kertoja (n) |
| kertomuš (n) |
| kertuo (vblex) |
| kerätä (vblex) |
| kerätä (vblex) |
| keräytyä (vblex) |
| kešen (post) |
| keškenäh (adv) |
| keškuš (n) |
| kesseli (n) |
| kešä#kuu (n) |
| kešä#loma (n) |
| kešä (n) |
| kevät#kuu (n) |
| kielelline (adj) |
| kieli (n) |
| kieli#pešä (n) |
| kielteä (vblex) |
| Kiestinki (np) (top ) |
| kiinitteä (vblex) |
| kiinitämini (n) |
| kiinitämini (n) |
| kiinnitämini (n) |
| kiinnoššuš (n) |
| kiinnoššuttua (vblex) |
| kiinnoštoa (vblex) |
| kiinnostuo (vblex) |
| kiitteä (vblex) |
| kiivaš#luontoni (adj) |
| kilometri (n) |
| kilpahiihto (n) |
| kilpailla (vblex) |
| kilpailu#festivali (n) |
| kilpailu (n) |
| kinnaš (n) |
| kippura#nokkani (adj) |
| kippura#nokkani (adj) |
| Kira (np) (ant ) (f ) |
| kirikkö (n) |
| Kirilä (np) (cog ) |
| kirjallisuš (n) |
| kirja (n) |
| kirjašto (n) |
| kirjonta#motiivi (n) |
| kirjuttaja (n) |
| kirjuttoa (vblex) |
| kirkaš (adj) |
| kirkkahašti (adv) |
| kisa (n) |
| kiskoa (vblex) |
| kitkie (vblex) |
| kiukoa (n) |
| kiukua (n) |
| kiušata (vblex) |
| Kiži (np) (top ) |
| kiänteä (vblex) |
| kiäntäjä (n) |
| kiäntämis#työ (n) |
| klo (n) (abbr ) |
| kohti (post) |
| koivu (n) |
| kokko (n) |
| kokoelma (n) |
| kokoni (adj) |
| koko (prn) (ind ) |
| kollektiivi (n) |
| kolmaš (adj) (ord ) |
| kolme (num) (card ) |
| Koloskova (np) (cog ) |
| kombinatti (n) |
| Komi (np) (top ) |
| Kondratjev (np) (cog ) |
| konehisto (n) |
| konkrettini (adj) |
| Kononova (np) (ant ) (f ) |
| konša (adv) |
| konserni (n) |
| konsertti (n) |
| Konstantin (np) (al ) |
| kontie (n) |
| kontien#poikane (n) |
| Kontupohja (np) (top ) |
| koprallini (adj) |
| kopra (n) |
| koris#sukši (n) |
| koristoa (vblex) |
| koristoa (vblex) |
| korjata (vblex) |
| korkie#koulutuš (n) |
| koroštoa (vblex) |
| koroštoa (vblex) |
| kortti (n) |
| košettoa (vblex) |
| koškie (vblex) |
| kos’s’onta (n) |
| koštamukšelaini (adj) |
| Kostamuš (np) (top ) |
| Koštamuš (np) (top ) |
| koti (n) |
| koti#tarha (n) |
| koukku (n) |
| koululaine (n) |
| koulu (n) |
| koulutuš (n) |
| kova (adj) |
| Koval’ova (np) (cog ) |
| Krasnodar (np) (top ) |
| KT (np) (al ) (acr ) |
| kučču (n) |
| kuččuo (vblex) |
| kudai (prn) (itg ) |
| kuin (cnjsub) |
| kuinka (adv) |
| kuitenki (adv) |
| kuiteški (adv) |
| kulttuuri (n) |
| kulttuuri#šeura (n) |
| kulttuuri#talo (n) |
| kummekšie (vblex) |
| kumpaine (prn) (ind ) |
| kumpaine (prn) (itg ) |
| kumpaine (prn) (rel ) |
| kun (cnjsub) |
| kuni (cnjsub) |
| kunnivoija (vblex) |
| kunnivo (n) |
| kunnon (adv) |
| kunta (n) |
| kunto (n) |
| kuorittoa (vblex) |
| kuotella (vblex) |
| ku (prn) (itg ) |
| Kurgan (np) (top ) |
| kuulla (vblex) |
| kuuluo (vblex) |
| kuulusa (adj) |
| kuu (n) |
| kuuši (num) (card ) |
| kuuvveš (adj) (ord ) |
| kuva (n) |
| kuvitella (vblex) |
| kuvittaja (n) |
| Kyllikki (np) (ant ) |
| kyllä (ij) |
| kylä#kirjašto (n) |
| kylä (n) |
| kylä (n) |
| kymmenen (num) (card ) |
| kymmeneš (adj) (ord ) |
| kynnyš (n) |
| kypšä (adj) |
| kyšymyš (n) |
| kyšyä (vblex) |
| kyykkä (n) |
| kyykkäri#polvi (n) |
| käsin (adv) |
| käsi (n) |
| käsi (n) |
| käsi#paikka (n) |
| käsitellä (vblex) |
| käšitellä (vblex) |
| käsittely (n) |
| käsi#työ (n) |
| käynti (n) |
| käytteä (vblex) |
| käyttäytyö (vblex) |
| käyvä (vblex) |
| Lahenpohja (np) (top ) |
| lahja (n) |
| lahja (n) |
| laita (n) |
| laiteh (n) |
| laitoš (n) |
| laitoš (n) |
| laittehisto (n) |
| laki (n) |
| L’angin (np) (cog ) |
| lapsien#kazvattaja (n) |
| lapšienpruasiekka (n) |
| lapši (n) |
| Larisa (np) (ant ) (f ) |
| laškie (vblex) |
